en: Transfer method: Heat-erasable pen method; Iron-on transfer; Lightbox/window tracing; Pre-printed on fabric; Printable template; Punch needle usable; Tracing template; Water-soluble stabilizer; Other
fr: Méthode de transfert: Méthode au stylo effaçable à la chaleur; Transfert thermocollant; Traçage sur table lumineuse/fenêtre; Pré-imprimé sur tissu; Modèle imprimable; Utilisable avec aiguille perforatrice; Modèle à tracer; Stabilisateur soluble dans l’eau; Autre
pl: Metoda transferu: Metoda z długopisem termicznym (ścieralnym pod wpływem ciepła); Naprasowanka (kalka termotransferowa); Kopiowanie przy użyciu podświetlacza (lightbox) / przez okno; Wstępnie nadrukowane na materiale; Szablon do druku; Odpowiednie do igły tkackiej (punch needle); Szablon do odrysowywania; Rozpuszczalny w wodzie stabilizator; Inne
lt-LT: Pervedimų metodas: Karščiu ištrinamo rašiklio metodas; Užlyginamas perkeliamasis paveikslėlis; Kopijavimas per šviesdėžę / langą; Iš anksto atspausdinta ant audinio; Spausdinamas šablonas; Galima naudoti perforavimo adatą; Kopijavimo šablonas; Vandenyje tirpstantis stabilizatorius; Kita
cs: Způsob aplikace transferu: Metoda s termomizecím perem; Nažehlovací fólie; Obkreslování přes prosvětlovací desku / okno; Předtištěno na látce; Šablona k vytištění; Použitelné pro punch needle; Šablona na obkreslování; Ve vodě rozpustný stabilizátor; Jiné
nb: Overføringsmetode: Metode med varmeslettbar penn; Strykemerke; Lysboks/vindussporing; Forhåndstrykt på stoff; Utskrivbar mal; Kan brukes med punch needle; Sporingsmal; Vannløselig stabilisator; Annet
zh-TW: 轉印方式: 熱消筆方式; 熨燙轉印; 燈箱/窗戶描圖; 布料預印; 可列印版型; 適用於戳戳繡; 描圖版型; 水溶性穩定劑; 其他
sl-SI: Način prenosa: Metoda s pisalom, izbrisljivim s toploto; Nanos z likanjem; Prerisovanje na svetlobni tabli/oknu; Predhodno natisnjeno na tkanino; Predloga za tisk; Primerno za tehniko punch needle; Predloga za prerisovanje; Vodotopni stabilizator; Drugo
hu: Transzferek-módszer: Hőre eltűnő toll módszer; Vasalható transzfer; Átvilágítós/ablakos átrajzolás; Előre nyomtatott anyagon; Nyomtatható sablon; Punch needle (hímzőtű) technikához használható; Átrajzolható sablon; Vízben oldódó stabilizátor; Egyéb
fi: Siirtomenetelmä: Lämpöhäipyvä kynä -menetelmä; Silitettävä siirtokuva; Valopöytä-/ikkunajäljennös; Esipainettu kankaalle; Tulostettava malli; Sopii tuftaukseen; Jäljennösmalli; Vesiliukoinen tukikangas; Muu
zh-CN: 转印方式: 热敏笔法; 熨烫转印; 灯箱/窗户透写; 织物预印; 可打印模板; 适用于戳戳绣; 透写模板; 水溶性稳定剂; 其他
da: Transfermetode: Metode med varmeraderbar pen; Strygemærke; Lysboks/vinduessporing; Fortrykt på stof; Printbar skabelon; Kan bruges til punch needle; Sporingsskabelon; Vandopløselig stabilisator; Andet
it: Metodo di applicazione: Metodo con penna cancellabile a caldo; Trasferibile a caldo; Ricalco con lavagna luminosa/finestra; Prestampato su tessuto; Modello stampabile; Utilizzabile per punch needle; Modello per ricalco; Stabilizzatore idrosolubile; Altro
pt-BR: Transfer método: Caneta apagável a calor; Transfer a ferro; Traçado na mesa de luz/janela; Pré-impresso no tecido; Modelo imprimível; Compatível com agulha mágica; Modelo para decalque; Estabilizador solúvel em água; Outro
tr: Transfer yöntemi: Isıyla silinebilir kalem yöntemi; Ütüyle aktarım; Işıklı masa/pencerede kopyalama; Kumaşa önceden basılı; Yazdırılabilir şablon; Panç iğnesine uygun; Kopyalama şablonu; Suda çözünebilen sabitleyici; Diğer
sk-SK: Metóda prevodu: Metóda tepelne zmazateľného pera; Nažehľovacia fólia; Obkresľovanie na svetelnom boxe/okne; Predtlačené na látke; Potlačiteľná šablóna; Použiteľné pre dutú ihlu; Obkresľovacia šablóna; Vodorozpustný stabilizátor; Iné
th: วิธีนี้: วิธีใช้ปากกาลบด้วยความร้อน; กระดาษรีดติด; การลอกลายผ่านกล่องไฟ/หน้าต่าง; พิมพ์ลงบนผ้าล่วงหน้า; เทมเพลตที่พิมพ์ได้; ใช้เข็มปักผ้าได้; เทมเพลตลอกลาย; แผ่นรองปักละลายน้ำ; อื่นๆ
es: Método de transferencia: Método con bolígrafo que se borra con calor; Transferencia termoadhesiva; Calco en caja de luz/ventana; Preimpreso en la tela; Plantilla imprimible; Apto para aguja mágica; Plantilla para calcar; Estabilizador soluble en agua; Otro
sv: Överföringsmetod : Metod med värmeraderbar penna; Stryk-på-transfer; Kalkering på ljusbord/fönster; Förtryckt på tyg; Utskrivbar mall; Kan användas med punch needle; Kalkeringsmall; Vattenlöslig stabilisator; Övrigt
ko: 전사 방법: 열 지우개 펜 방식; 다림질용 전사; 라이트박스/창문 트레이싱; 직물에 사전 인쇄; 인쇄 가능한 템플릿; 펀치 니들 사용 가능; 트레이싱 템플릿; 수용성 안정제; 기타
vi: Phương thức chuyển giao: Phương pháp bút xóa bằng nhiệt; Chuyển nhiệt bằng bàn ủi; Đồ hình bằng hộp đèn/cửa sổ; In sẵn trên vải; Mẫu có thể in; Có thể dùng kim thêu nổi (punch needle); Mẫu đồ hình; Giấy thêu tan trong nước; Khác
nl: Transfermethode: Methode met hitte-uitwisbare pen; Opstrijktransfer; Lichtbak/raam overtrekken; Voorgedrukt op stof; Printbaar sjabloon; Geschikt voor punch needle; Overtreksjabloon; In water oplosbare versteviging; Overig
pt-PT: Método de transferência: Método com caneta apagável a quente; Transferência a ferro; Traçado com caixa de luz/janela; Pré-impresso em tecido; Modelo imprimível; Pode ser usado com agulha mágica; Modelo de traçado; Estabilizador solúvel em água; Outro
hr-HR: Metoda prijenosa: Olovka osjetljiva na toplinu; Prijenos glačanjem; Precrtavanje (svjetleća kutija / prozor); Unaprijed ispisano na tkanini; Predložak za ispis; Pogodno za tehniku punch needle; Predložak za precrtavanje; Stabilizator topiv u vodi; Ostalo
bg-BG: Метод на трансфер: Метод с термоизтриваема химикалка; Трансфер с ютия; Очертаване чрез светеща кутия/прозорец; Предварително отпечатано върху плат; Шаблон за печат; Подходящо за punch needle; Шаблон за очертаване; Водоразтворим стабилизатор; Друго
ru: Метод переноса: Маркер, исчезающий при нагревании; Термоперенос утюгом; Копирование через световой короб/стекло; Предварительно напечатано на ткани; Шаблон для печати; Для ковровой вышивки; Шаблон для копирования; Водорастворимый стабилизатор; Другое
el: Μέθοδος μεταφοράς: Μέθοδος με στιλό που σβήνει με τη θερμότητα; Μεταφορά με σιδέρωμα; Αντιγραφή με φωτεινή επιφάνεια/παράθυρο; Προεκτυπωμένο σε ύφασμα; Εκτυπώσιμο πρότυπο; Κατάλληλο για punch needle; Πρότυπο για ιχνογράφηση; Υδατοδιαλυτός σταθεροποιητής; Άλλο
de: Transfermethode: Methode mit hitzelöschbarem Stift; Transfer zum Aufbügeln; Abpausen mit Leuchtkasten/am Fenster; Vorgedruckt auf Stoff; Druckbare Vorlage; Verwendbar mit Punch Needle; Schablone zum Abpausen; Wasserlöslicher Stabilisator; Sonstige
ja: 転写方法: 熱消去ペン法; アイロン転写; ライトボックス / ウィンドウトレース; 布に印刷済み; 印刷可能テンプレート; パンチニードル対応; トレーステンプレート; 水溶性安定剤; その他
ro-RO: Metoda de transfer: Metodă cu stilou cu ștergere la cald; Transfer termic (cu fierul de călcat); Copiere la casetă luminoasă/fereastră; Preimprimat pe material; Șablon imprimabil; Se poate utiliza ac de perforat (punch needle); Șablon pentru copiere; Stabilizator solubil în apă; Altele